vec_IT/vec_IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -ér inregolari ((re)(g)aver)
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2c0P0P1P2
SFX c0 Y 199
SFX c0 0 me/P6P7 aver
SFX c0 0 ne/I1 o	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver ebi/P3P4P5I2 aver
SFX c0 aver ebia/P0P1P2 aver
SFX c0 aver ebie/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 aver ebiede/I4 aver
SFX c0 aver ebiege/I4 aver
SFX c0 aver ebiemo/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 aver ebien/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver ebiene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver ebion/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 aver ebione/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver ebionme/P6P7 aver
SFX c0 aver ebiè/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver ebiène/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver ebié/I4 aver
SFX c0 aver ebiémoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 aver ebiéu/I5 aver
SFX c0 aver ebiónmene/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver élo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver ene/I1 aver	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver epi/P3P4P5I2 aver
SFX c0 aver epia/P0P1P2 aver
SFX c0 aver epie/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 aver epiede/I4 aver
SFX c0 aver epiege/I4 aver
SFX c0 aver epiemo/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 aver epien/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver epiene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver epion/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 aver epione/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver epionme/P6P7 aver
SFX c0 aver epiè/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver epiène/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver epié/I4 aver
SFX c0 aver epiémoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 aver epiéu/I5 aver
SFX c0 aver epiónmene/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver ese/M0FS aver
SFX c0 aver eva/P3P4P5I0I4 aver
SFX c0 aver eve/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver evi/I0I2I4 aver
SFX c0 aver evo/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver èva/P3P4P5I0I4 aver
SFX c0 aver ève/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver èvi/I0I2I4 aver
SFX c0 aver èvo/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver éƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver à/P0P1P2I0I2 aver
SFX c0 aver àbielo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver àbiene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver àbieƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver àbime/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver àbimene/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver àbionme/P6P7 aver
SFX c0 aver àbitu/I3 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver àe/P3P4P5I0 aver	ts:conditional_present
SFX c0 aver àene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver àlo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver àme/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver àmene/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver àne/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver àpielo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver àpiene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver àpieƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver àpime/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver àpimene/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver àpionme/P6P7 aver
SFX c0 aver àpitu/I3 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver àƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver èbielo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver èbiene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver èbieƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver èpielo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver èpiene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver èpieƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver éane/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver éau/I5 aver
SFX c0 aver ébiene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver ébime/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver ébimene/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver ébitu/I3 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver éelo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver éene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver éeƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver éimo/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver éimoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 aver éitu/I3 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver emo/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 aver émoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 aver émome/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver émomene/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver éone/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver épiene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver épime/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver épimene/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver épitu/I3 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver érmene/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 aver ésimo aver
SFX c0 aver éu/I5 aver
SFX c0 aver évane/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver évau/I5 aver
SFX c0 aver évelo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver évene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver éveƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 aver évimo/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver évimoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 aver évitu/I3 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver évone/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 aver í/P3P4P5I4 aver
SFX c0 aver ímoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 aver ò/I0 aver
SFX c0 aver òe/I1 aver
SFX c0 er e/I1 aver
SFX c0 er éelo/A1 aver
SFX c0 er éeƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 er ésimo aver
SFX c0 er évane/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 er évau/I5 aver
SFX c0 o e/P0P1P2I0 o
SFX c0 r me/P6P7 aver
SFX c0 r mo/P0P1P2 aver
SFX c0 r n/I0 aver
SFX c0 r va/P3P4P5 aver
SFX c0 ver bi/P3P4P5I2 aver
SFX c0 ver bia/P0P1P2 aver
SFX c0 ver biando/P0P1P2 ver
SFX c0 ver bianto/P0P1P2 ver
SFX c0 ver bie/P3P4P5I0 aver
SFX c0 ver biede/I4 aver
SFX c0 ver biege/I4 aver
SFX c0 ver biemo/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 ver bien/I0 aver
SFX c0 ver biene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver bion/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 ver bione/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver biàndome/P6P7P8 ver
SFX c0 ver biàndomene/P6P7P8 ver
SFX c0 ver biè/I0 aver
SFX c0 ver biène/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver bié/I4 aver
SFX c0 ver biémoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 ver biéu/I5 aver
SFX c0 ver budo/A1 aver
SFX c0 ver bú/A1 aver
SFX c0 ver pi/P3P4P5I2 aver
SFX c0 ver pia/P0P1P2 aver
SFX c0 ver pie/P3P4P5I0 aver
SFX c0 ver piede/I4 aver
SFX c0 ver piege/I4 aver
SFX c0 ver piemo/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 ver pien/I0 aver
SFX c0 ver piene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver pion/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 ver pione/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver piè/I0 aver
SFX c0 ver piène/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver pié/I4 aver
SFX c0 ver piémoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 ver piéu/I5 aver
SFX c0 ver ràlo/A1 aver
SFX c0 ver ràne/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver ràtu/I3 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver rave/P3P4P5I8I9 aver	ts:conditional_present
SFX c0 ver raƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 ver remo/P0P1P2I0 aver
SFX c0 ver resi/I4 aver
SFX c0 ver resiu/I5 aver
SFX c0 ver rimo/I0 aver
SFX c0 ver risi/I4 aver
SFX c0 ver risiu/I5 aver
SFX c0 ver rà/P3P4P5I0I2 aver
SFX c0 ver ràe/P3P4P5 aver	ts:conditional_present
SFX c0 ver ràvelo/A1 aver
SFX c0 ver ràvene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver ràveƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 ver rè/I0 aver
SFX c0 ver rène/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver ré/I4 aver
SFX c0 ver rémoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 ver rémome/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 ver rémomene/P6P7P8 aver
SFX c0 ver résimo/I0 aver
SFX c0 ver résimoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 ver réu/I5 aver
SFX c0 ver rí/I4 aver
SFX c0 ver ría/P3P4P5I0I2 aver
SFX c0 ver rèe/P3P4P5I0I2 aver
SFX c0 ver ríane/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver ríatu/I3 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver ríelo/A1 aver
SFX c0 ver ríene/I1 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver ríeƚo/A1 aver
SFX c0 ver rímoe/I1 aver
SFX c0 ver rísitu/I3 aver	is:interrogative
SFX c0 ver ríu/I5 aver
SFX c0 ver rò/I0 aver
SFX c0 ver ròe/I1 aver
SFX c0 ver tu/I3 aver	is:interrogative
