vec_IT/vec_IT.dic
ʼéo/c0I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ʼer
ʼvéo/c0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ʼver
ào/c0I0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:aver st:aer
aver/a0a1a2c0P0P1P2.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
gaver/a0a1a2c0P0P1P2.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
gào/c0I0.0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:gaver
